Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.070

Examining board.

No person shall be appointed and commissioned or warranted to any office in the organized militia of Washington unless he or she shall have been examined and adjudged qualified therefor by an examining board, appointed by the adjutant general, and whose report shall have been approved by the authority appointing the board. The composition, appointment and procedure of examining boards and the nature and scope of examinations shall be as prescribed by the laws or regulations of the United States or those of this state. Whenever a commissioned officer shall have been examined for promotion pursuant to this section and shall have been adjudged not qualified therefor, upon approval by the authority appointing the board of its report to that effect such officer may be honorably discharged, retired or placed in the reserve as the governor shall direct.

[ 1989 c 19 s 15; 1943 c 130 s 20; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-20. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 13; 1909 c 134 s 32; 1895 c 108 s 53.]